<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881025-0016 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-25-88.f2.A1015</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 53, No. 206 / Tuesday, October 25, 1988/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Part 147 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL 3311-2] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Underground Injection Control Programs for Certain Indian Lands </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) is promulgatingFederally administered Underground Injection Control (UIC) programs forthe Navajo Indian lands, Ute Mountain Ute Indian lands, and other Indianlands in New Mexico and Oklahoma as part of its mandate to regulate allunderground injection activity in the United States. These programs arebased on the Federal program, but contain some additions and modifications.Elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>, the Agency is promulgating Underground InjectionControl programs for all other Indian lands not already covered by an applicableUIC program. Together these actions will regulate all injection wells onIndian lands in order to protect underground sources of drinking water.Today's notice does not contain procedures by which Indian Tribes may applyfor primary enforcement responsibility. That issue will be addressed ina separate <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>This rule will become effective on November 25, 1988. Forthe purposes of judicial review, this rule will be considered final agencyaction at 1:00 p.m. eastern time on November 8, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>The record is available for inspection in Room 1143ETin the Underground Injection Control Branch, State Programs Division, Officeof Drinking Water (WH-550E) EPA, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460.(202) 382-5594.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Donald M. Olson, UndergroundInjection Control Branch, State Programs Division, Office of Drinking Water,EPA (WH-550E) 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460. (202) 382-5558.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>The Safe Drinking Water Act (SDWA) authorized EPA to regulate undergroundinjection activity on all lands in the United States, including Indianlands. (EPA has adopted the definition of ``Indian country'' found at 18U.S.C. 1151, as the definition of ``Indian lands'' for the Direct ImplementationUIC program. It is set forth in full at 40 CFR 144.3). The 1986 Amendmentsto the SDWA specifically directed EPA to promulgate by March 1987 a FederalUIC program for all Indian lands not already covered by an applicable UICprogram. EPA has promulgated the ``generic'' Federal program contained in 40 CFRParts 124, 144, and 146 for most Indian lands. All those not previouslypromulgated were promulgated today in a separate <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. The ``generic'' Federal program is thesame program that EPA administers on non-Indian lands in many States. Afew Indian Tribes expressed interest in requirements that differ somewhatfrom the generic Federal requirements. The SDWA and its regulations allow flexibility to respond to the uniqueconditions and needs of Indian Tribes, and EPA policy encourages such accommodation.The SDWA sets forth only very general criteria for establishing UIC programs.The SDWA directs the EPA to promulgate regulations establishing the minimumrequirements for State UIC programs, and then to approve and promulgateindividual programs for each State. The State programs must meet the requirementsof EPA's regulations (except for State programs regulating Class II wellswhich are authorized under section 1425 of the SDWA), but need not be identical.Section 1421(b)(3) of the SDWA directs the Administrator to ``permit orprovide for consideration of varying geologic, hydrological, or historicalconditions in different States and in different areas within a State.''Most of the State programs for States which have primary enforcement responsibilitydo differ from the Federal program. Although the State programs for theStates in which EPA administers the programs basically consist of the Federalgeneric regulations, many of them contain variations. Section 1451(a)(1), added by the 1986 SDWA Amendments, authorized the Administratorto treat Indian Tribes as States under the SDWA. This provision is distinctfrom the authorization to delegate to Indian Tribes primary enforcementresponsibility and to provide grant and contract assistance. Section 1451goes on to say that where treatment of Tribes as identical to States isinappropriate or infeasible the Administrator may use other means for achievingthe purpose of the provision. EPA believes that allowing some variationin a Tribe's UIC program to accomodate its geological and historic differences,while maintaining a program no less stringent than the generic program,would achieve the purpose of the 1986 Amendments. The EPA Indian Policy, issued November 8, 1984, committed the Agency todeal with Indian Tribes on a government-to-government basis, to assistthem in developing the capability to manage their own environmental programsand to give great weight to their concerns when designing programs fortheir lands. Application of this policy to the UIC program has been discussedin the preambles to several regulations and is partially codified at 40CFR 144.2. (47 FR 17578, April 23, 1982; 48 FR 40100, September 2, 1983).<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Development of This Rule </ITAG>This rule has been under discussion for several years. In <T4>Federal Register </T4>notices on September 2, 1983 (48 FR 40100) andMay 11, 1984 (49 FR 20340), EPA asked for comment on four options for UICprograms on Indian lands including: (1) Programs identical to the Federalgeneric rules, (2) programs similar to those in the State surrounding theIndian lands, (3) programs including a combination of Federal and Stateprovisions, and (4) new programs reflecting the concerns of the Tribe.There was no agreement among the States, the industry, and the Indian Tribesabout which was the best option. While most Indian Tribes appeared to becontent with the Federal generic program, certain tribes had special concernsor provisions that they wanted incorporated into any UIC program on theirlands. The Navajo, Ute Mountain Ute, and several of the Oklahoma Tribespursued their preferences for tailored UIC program provisions during thenext few years. The passage of the 1986 Amendments to the SDWA accelerated the decisionprocess. On May 11, 1987, EPA proposed to extend the Federal generic UICprogram to most Indian lands. In a separate <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice on the same day, the Agency proposed somewhatdifferent programs for the lands of the Navajo, the Ute Mountain Ute, otherTribes in New Mexico and the Indian lands in Oklahoma not already covered.Five public hearings on the ``tailored programs'' were held in New Mexico,Arizona, and Oklahoma. Sixteen people commented on them either at the publichearings or in writing afterwards. The commenters generally approved ofthe scheme of adding some variations to the Federal generic program, butchanges were suggested for some of the individual sections. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Scope </ITAG>Today's rule consists of two tailored programs. One covers all wells onthe Navajo Indian lands, wells on the lands of the Ute Mountain Ute (ClassII wells only on Ute Mountain Ute lands in Colorado, and all wells on UteMountain Ute lands in Utah and New Mexico) and all wells on other Indianlands in New Mexico. The lands of the Navajo extend into the States ofNew Mexico, Utah, and Arizona, areas covered by EPA Regions VI, VIII andIX. The latest inventory of wells on Navajo Indian lands indicates thereis a total of 704 Class II wells (458 in Utah, 241 in New Mexico, and 5in Arizona), 87 Class III wells (all in New Mexico) and two Class V wells(both in New Mexico). The Ute Mountain Ute lands extend into the States of New Mexico, Coloradoand Utah, EPA Regions VI and VIII. There are 15 Class II wells on Ute MountainUte lands (12 in New Mexico and three in Colorado). EPA is already administeringthe generic Federal program for non-Class II wells on the lands of theUte Mountain Ute in Colorado. The remainder of the existing injection wells in New Mexico on Indian landsare three Class II wells on the Jicarilla Indian Reservation and threeClass V wells on the Laguna Indian Reservation. The second tailored program applies to all classes of wells on all Indianlands in Oklahoma, except for Class II wells on the Osage Mineral Reservein Osage County and Class II wells on the lands of the Five Civilized Tribes(Choctaw, Cherokee, Chickasaw, Creek and Seminole). The Class II programfor the Osage Mineral Reserve was promulgated on November 15, 1984, andmay be found at 40 CFR 147 Subpart GGG. The Class II program on the landsof the Five Civilized Tribes was promulgated on December 2, 1981, as partof the State-administered program. (40 CFR 147, Subpart LL). The latest inventory indicates that there are one Class I well and 194Class II wells on the Indian lands in Oklahoma covered by this proposal.The wells are located on lands of 13 of the 33 tribes. The UIC programs for most Indian lands outside the scope of this rule areidentical to the Federal generic program, although a few programs ban someclasses of injection wells. A notice of the promulgation of UIC programsfor Indian lands in forty-one states and territories appears elsewherein today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>. UIC programs on Indian lands in fourteen otherstates were previously promulgated. (52 FR 17680, May 11, 1987; 49 FR 45292,November 15, 1984; 49 FR 20138, May 11, 1984). <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Comments and Modifications to the Proposed Rule </ITAG>EPA received relatively few comments on this proposed rule. Most of themconcerned either the notice, mechanical integrity, or injection pressureprovisions of the proposed rule. Comments on specific provisions and EPA'sresponses are incorporated into the section-by-section description whichfollows.A. General Comments EPA also received some general comments regarding the proposed rule. Twoof the Indian commenters made general statements of support for the UICprograms which they believe will protect ground water. One of the Indiancommenters also thanked EPA for informing and consulting his tribe as theproposal was developed. The Hopi Tribe emphasized its special situation,surrounded by the Navajo lands and sharing ownership of many resourceswith the Navajo. The Hopi had no suggestions for special provisions, butwanted to be sure that they would have an opportunity for future involvement.Finally, one of the States reiterated its preference for extending theState program to Indian lands. EPA continues to believe, as explained inthe preamble to the proposed rule, that administering a State program wouldnot be feasible. Some provisions of State UIC programs are dependent uponState authority. EPA would not have authority to enforce these provisionsunder the SDWA. B. Jurisdiction Issues Two commenters had questions about the definition of Indian lands and howEPA would set the jurisdictional boundaries for these programs. As mentionedabove, the definition of Indian lands adopted for the UIC program is setforth in 40 CFR 144.3. Whatever definition is chosen, there will be disagreementsabout whether particular lands fall within the definition. An Indian tribewould probably object to a State exercising jurisdiction over lands itperceives as Indian lands, and a State would object to an Indian Tribeexercising  authority over lands which it believes to be non-Indian lands.Thus, disputes could prevent both the State and the Indian tribe from exercisingprimary enforcement responsibility for a UIC program. In order to ensureregulation of injection wells and minimize any disruption, pending theresolution of jurisdictional disputes, EPA will implement the Federal UICprogram for disputed lands. The recently proposed EPA regulation to allow Indian Tribes to apply forprimary enforcement authority under the SDWA does not define Indian landsover which the Tribe could exercise UIC authority. The proposed rule wouldallow neighboring governmental units to object to a Tribe's assertion ofjurisdiction. When there is a conflicting claim, EPA will consult withthe Department of the Interior and decide whether the Tribe has adequatelydemonstrated jurisdiction to administer a program under the SDWA. A Tribemay not proceed to the next step of applying for primary enforcement responsibilityover a particular program until EPA has determined that the Tribe's jurisdictionalshowing is adequate. This different approach is consistent with the different mandate for theprimacy regulations. The primacy regulations allow for transfer of responsibilityfor the UIC (and other SDWA programs) under carefully delineated criteriaspecified in section 1451. On the other hand, the intent of the last sentenceof section 1422(e) is to make sure that all Indian lands are covered bysome UIC program. There will be cases in which a Tribe does not apply forprimacy or cannot demonstrate its jurisdiction, but a State could not administerthe UIC program on those lands. The EPA must administer the UIC programsfor those lands. One commenter wanted to be sure that jurisdictional decisions would bemade ahead of time, as the program is being established, rather than onan ad-hoc basis later. Although this sounds sensible, it will not be possible.Advance decisions would delay the implementation of the program for anunacceptable amount of time. As described above, EPA will assume that landsdescribed by the definition in 40 CFR 144.3 are Indian lands and will beginimplementation of the UIC program on them. If disputed territory is lateradjudged to be non-Indian lands, it will be deleted from the EPA DirectImplementation Indian land program and added either to the EPA (non-Indianland) DI program for that State or to the State program, as appropriate.Another commenter suggested that for Class II wells, the definition ofIndian lands be restricted to the reservation because that would be inline with other regulations of the oil and gas industry. As described above,EPA believes that restricting these regulations to the reservations couldresult in unregulated wells on non-reservation Indian lands. The commenterwent on to say that under the definition of Indian country ``all a tribehas to do is buy a small parcel of land with a well on it and they willassume complete authority over an operation in which they have no interest.''It appears that this commenter thought the regulations would confer primaryenforcement responsibility on the Indian tribes, but that is covered undera separate set of regulations. Under this rule, the Federal EPA will regulatewells on whatever is considered Indian land. Furthermore, purchases ofland by Indians or Indian tribes is not alone sufficient to make the land``Indian Country.'' If land owned by Indians is not held in trust or withrestraints on alienation, it is no different than land owned by other persons.Thus, the State has authority over it and may implement its UIC program(assuming the State has been granted primacy). If ownership of mineralrights and the surface estate is split, and either is considered Indianlands, the Federal EPA will regulate the well under the Indian land program.<ITAG tagnum="85">V. Program Contents_Provisions of the Navajo, Ute Mountain Ute, andNew Mexico Indian Lands Program </ITAG>The program for the Navajo, Ute Mountain Ute, and New Mexico Indian landsincorporates the Federal UIC program codified at 40 CFR Parts 124, 144and 146 with certain additional requirements described below.As more than one commenter pointed out, the proposed rule incorrectly listedthe effective date of both tailored programs as June 10, 1987 (30 daysafter publication of the proposed rule). The effective date should haveread ``30 days after publication of the final rule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.'' A. Public Notice of Permit Actions (andSection; 147.3002) The proposed rule required actual, individual notification of intent toapply for a permit to landowners, tenants, and lease operators within one-halfmile of the well, in addition to the notice to the affected Tribal government.Some oil industry commenters objected to the proposed notice requirement,particularly to tenants, saying that it was difficult and unnecessary.Both commenters thought it should be sufficient to notify the Tribal government.One commenter also thought the waiver provision was burdensome. EPA has decided not to change the proposed notice requirement. Similarprovisions are being implemented without undue difficulties in New Mexicoand Oklahoma. Those commenting on proposed permit applications are frequentlytenants and landowners. EPA believes that it is good practice to give noticeto those actually on the land where new drilling is contemplated, and otherkinds of notice may not be adequate in sparsely populated areas. Finally,if the requirement to give notice is too onerous in a particular situation,the permittee may apply for a waiver. The waiver may apply to an area ratherthan to a single permit.Affected Tribal governments will be notified by owners or operators ofan intent to apply for a permit. EPA will also provide to the affectedTribal governments all notices given to ``affected States'' under andSection;124.10(c) of this chapter. A Bureau of Land Management (BLM) field office suggested that EPA notifylocal BLM and Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) offices of proposed permitactions at the same time as affected Tribal governments to facilitate reviewand processing. However, andSection; 124.10(c)(1) already requires EPA tosend notice of permit actions to federal agencies with jurisdiction overfish and wildlife resources and other ``appropriate government authorities.''BIA and BLM, which retain some jurisdiction over injection wells and theprojects of which they are a part, constitute ``appropriate governmentalauthorities.'' Thus, there is no need to establish by regulation additionalnotice for these federal agencies. EPA, BIA and BLM are developing Memorandaof Agreement covering mutual notice for these Indian lands. The Navajo Tribe requested that it be notified of maximum injection pressuresestablished for individual fields under the procedures of andSection; 147.3006(b)(1).That paragraph requires the Director to provide opportunity for commentand public hearing according to the provisions of Part 124, Subpart A ofthis chapter before setting the field pressure, and informing the ownersand operators in writing of the final decision. The Navajo wish to be apprisedof the final decision. The Tribe will have been informed of the tentativedecision under the procedures of Part 124 because affected Tribes willreceive all notices sent to affected state governments whenever the proceduresof Part 124 are used. EPA has no objection to providing notice of the finaldecision as well. Section 147.3006(b)(1) has been changed to add this notice.B. Aquifer Exemptions (andSection; 147.3003(a)) The SDWA protects all underground sources of drinking water, whether ornot specifically designated as such. The regulations define ``undergroundsource of drinking water'' very broadly as: An aquifer which supplies orwhich contains a sufficient quantity of ground water to supply a publicwater system and either; currently supplies drinking water for human consumption,or contains less than 10,000 mg/l TDS; and which is not an exempted aquifer.Under existing regulations, EPA may exempt from the UIC program aquiferswhich have the capacity to supply public water systems and contain lessthan 10,000 mg/l TDS if they do not now and could not in the future serveas a source for a public water supply for one of the reasons recognizedin the regulations (40 CFR 146.4). Owners and operators of injection wellsmay inject into an exempted aquifer. EPA is aware that some Class II wells on the lands of the Navajo, particularlyenhanced recovery wells, are injecting into aquifers with less than 10,000TDS water. If the Agency had not designated them exempted aquifers underthis rule, injection would have become illegal on the day the UIC programtook effect. New wells may necessitate additional aquifer exemptions afterprogram promulgation. Owners and operators may apply for them using establishedAgency procedures. The exemptions included in this rule are limited to the injection formationonly and to Class II wells. Some of the aquifers that EPA has exemptedare at a great depth, an average of 5,400 feet. The aquifers in questionserve as the injection zone for enhanced recovery wells, and by their nature,are hydrocarbon producing zones. EPA has investigated the aquifers andsolicited comment on them, and has found that the formations are not nowused as sources of drinking water, and because of their hydrocarbon contentare not expected to be used for these purposes in the future. The exemptedaquifers are listed in Appendix A. The Agency received four comments on the aquifer exemption provisions.The first suggested that EPA modify its regulations so that an operatorcould inject produced fluids back into the formation from which they camewithout any conditions or necessity for exemptions. This comment is directedat a long-established part of the Federal UIC program on which commentsare no longer timely. Furthermore, the requirement for exemptions is basedon the statutory mandate to protect all aquifers which supply or can reasonablybe expected to supply a public water system. EPA may only allow injectioninto a formation which has the capacity to supply a public water systemupon a showing that there is some other reason why it would never be usedfor public water supplies; that it is not in fact an underground sourceof drinking water. The second comment was from the Navajo Tribe who did not want EPA to exemptany aquifers until it had had a chance to comment. EPA's procedures requirean opportunity for comment on requests for aquifer exemptions. The aquiferexemption requests received during the comment period on this proposalwill be processed with separate notices of opportunity to comment afterthis rule becomes effective. The Navajo also noted that the area around a well that is exempted is one-quartermile while the area around a well which must be examined for abandonedand improperly completed wells is one-half mile, and suggested that theyought to be the same: Both one-half mile. The Agency believes that thecone of influence, the area in which pressure is changed by injection,is larger than the area which will actually receive the injected fluid.It is only necessary to exempt that portion which will be contaminatedby injection fluid, not that part merely influenced by pressure. Thus,the Agency believes that it is appropriate to have a smaller area coveredby the aquifer exemption.Another industry commenter wanted the Agency to exempt aquifers withinthe areal extent of productive fields currently used for injection becauseit would allow operators to drill new wells in active areas without applyingfor permits. EPA points out that the premise of the suggestion is legallyincorrect. Aquifer exemptions and permits are independent requirements.Even if the whole aquifer has been exempted, new injection wells requirepermits (with some exceptions). However, an owner or operator of a fieldwhich has been exempted may apply for an area permit under andSection; 144.33.This permit allows new wells to be drilled without individual permits.EPA chose to exempt only the area surrounding active wells because it believesthat a restrictive policy is consistent with the SDWA. The SDWA presumesthat aquifers are underground sources of drinking water, and the regulatoryprogram should make the same presumption until someone demonstrates thata particular aquifer is not a USDW and that there is a reason to exemptit. As the preamble to the proposed rule stated, EPA will entertain requestsfor exempting whole fields. The commenter did not submit a request forits fields. EPA sees no reason to revise its policy, but will considerany request for aquifer exemptions submitted by this or any other owneror operator. The same commenter also suggested that EPA should not rely on lists ofexempted aquifers in the Regions, but should either publish them in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>or exempt all aquifers into which wells are currentlyinjecting. EPA agrees that publication in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>will make it easier to check on the status ofaquifers, and as the description of exempted aquifers turned out to beof a manageable length, the exempted portions of aquifers on these Indianlands are published as an appendix to today's rule. Minor exeptions grantedin the future will not be published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>because they are not considered substantial programrevisions under andSection; 145.32. (Minor exemptions are those associatedwith a single permit action or concerning an aquifer of more than 3000TDS and related to a Class II, III or V well. See 48 FR 40108, Sept. 2,1983). As is the case for all UIC programs, the Regional EPA offices willmaintain a complete list of aquifer exemptions, both major and minor. Thosedesiring to ascertain the status of aquifers in the future should checkwith the Regional EPA offices as well as the CFR. C. Aquifer Cleanup (andSection; 147.3003(b) and andSection; 147.3011) The generic Federal program requires owners and operators of Class IIIwells which inject in or through an exempted aquifer to demonstrate thatthe plugging and abandonment plan will protect underground sources of drinkingwater (USDWs). The Director of a UIC program must prescribe ``aquifer clean-upand monitoring where he deems it necessary and feasible to ensure adequateprotection of USDWs.'' (40 CFR 146.10(d)). This means that the mined areamust be cleaned up to the extent necessary and feasible after cessationof mining so that contaminants from mining operations will not endangerthe USDWs surrounding the exempted portion which had been mined. Today's rule requires some clean-up and monitoring for Class III uraniumprojects located on these Indian lands and injecting in or through an exemptedaquifer of 5,000 milligrams per liter (mg/l) total dissolved solids (TDS)or less, as needed to protect surrounding USDWs. The generic regulationsat andSection; 146.10(d) give the Director the discretion to prescribe aquiferclean up where he deems it necessary and feasible. The economic and technologicalfeasibility of such clean-up for uranium mines has been demonstrated forthe types of mining and geology likely to be covered by the program inprojects in New Mexico and Texas. Although the rule requires some clean-up,the contaminants of concern and the actual level of clean-up and monitoringwill be decided for each project and specified in its permit. The Directorwould continue to be able to use the discretion granted in andSection; 146.10(d)in deciding whether to require clean-up and monitoring for other kindsof Class III projects and for uranium mining projects injecting in or throughaquifers of 5,000-10,000 mg/l TDS. The scarce water in this arid region is very valuable and justifies thishigher level of protection, which has been specifically requested by theaffected Tribes. All of the existing (though currently abandoned) ClassIII projects covered by this rule are located on Indian lands in New Mexicoand New Mexico is the most likely location for new Class III wells. TheNew Mexico State UIC program requires levels of protection equivalent tothose specified in this program. Pre-injection formation water quality will be analyzed by the applicantfor appropriate ground-water contaminants. The level of clean-up for eachcontaminant will be specified in the permit. It will be set as close asis feasible to the original conditions. If a permittee finds, after reasonable attempts, that an approved clean-upplan has proven infeasible to achieve in practice, he may document forthe Director the attempt and failure to achieve contaminant levels setin the permit standards and request a modification of the clean-up standardsthrough the procedures in 40 CFR 144.39 and 124.5. The permittee must submit a proposed schedule for clean-up to the Directorfor his approval at the time the permittee requests permission to plugand abandon the well (see andSection; 146.34(c)). The owner or operator willcontinue clean-up and monitoring according to the clean-up schedule untilnotified by the Director that the conditions of his permit have been satisfied.The Director will base his decision on reports submitted by the operatorand the results of water quality analyses. The permittee must notify theDirector at least two weeks in advance of sampling dates and provide theopportunity for splitting samples with the Director.EPA recommends to the Director the following procedure to determine whensufficient clean-up has been achieved. After three consecutive sample sets(a ``sample set'' is one sample from each well designated in the permit)taken at a minimum of 30-day intervals, show that constituents from eachwell are at concentrations equal to or less than that required by the permit,the Director will allow the permittee to cease clean-up efforts. The permitteewill be required to file with the Director a written report of the resultsof the analyses and a summary of clean-up efforts. After filing the report,sampling for all constituents listed in the permit would again be conductedat 30-day intervals for a minimum of three more sample sets and reportedto the Director. (This makes a total of six sample sets.) The Directorwill determine within 120 days of receiving the sixth sample analysis whetheror not clean-up has been achieved. Upon acknowledment in writing by theDirector of final clean-up, the permittee may cease all monitoring andclean-up activities in the affected area. One commenter suggested that EPA make clear that the level of contaminantsin each well must meet the permit level, that they cannot be averaged.EPA has made that clarification. D. Duration of Rule Authorization for Class I and III Wells (andSection;147.3004, 3007(a)) Owners and operators of existing Class I and III wells must submit permitapplications no later than 90 days after the program becomes effective.The generic Federal program contains a one-year deadline. The longer periodwas established for administrative reasons, as it was clearly impossibleto process all of the Class I and III permits in all direct implementationprograms in a shorter time. However, there is only one existing Class Iwell covered by this program and only three Class III projects. In addition,owners and operators have already gathered most of the information forrelated submissions to State agencies. Therefore, the shorter period forpermit application should not be a burden to owners and operators or toEPA. E. Additional Requirements for Wells Injecting Radioactive Waste (andSection;147.3005 and andSection; 147.3016) Under the generic Federal program, wells which inject radioactive wastebelow the lowermost USDW are Class V wells and are not currently subjectto specific technical standards (40 CFR 146.51). Today's rule continuesto classify wells which inject radioactive waste as Class V, but requiresthem to comply with all permitting requirements pertaining to Class I wells(under the authority of andSection; 144.25(a)(3)). Among other things, thisrule requires owners and operators to obtain a permit before constructinga radioactive waste disposal well and to comply with Class I constructionand operating standards and requirements. The Navajo Tribe specificallyrequested increased stringency for radioactive waste wells. SurroundingState UIC programs contain similar provisions. The definition of ``radioactive waste'' contained in 40 CFR 144.3 is unchanged,and refers to any waste which contains radioactive materials in concentrationswhich exceed those listed in 10 CFR Part 20, Appendix B, Table II, Column2. However, wells which inject high level and transuranic waste and spentnuclear fuel covered by 40 CFR Part 191 will continue to be covered bythe general Class V regulations, and EPA will develop additional specificprovisions should such a well be proposed. EPA is not aware of any existing wells injecting radioactive wastes locatedon the Indian lands covered by this proposal. Any future radioactive wastedisposal wells on Indian lands are expected to be associated with uraniummine sites. F. Maximum Injection Pressure Limit for Rule-Authorized Class II Salt WaterDisposal Wells (andSection; 147.3006(a)) Under the generic Federal regulations at 40 CFR 144.28(f)(3)(ii) and 40CFR 146.23(a), the owner or operator is generally directed not to exceedwhatever maximum pressure at the wellhead would assure that injection willnot initiate new fractures or propagate existing fractures in the confiningzone adjacent to the USDW. Today's rule establishes a maximum surface injection pressure of 0.2 poundsper square inch (psi) for each foot of depth to the top of the injectionzone for rule-authorized Class II salt water disposal wells on these Indianlands. This limit has been used for several years by the State of New Mexicoand is considered by EPA to be a very conservative formula to prevent fracturingof the injection zone. For Class II wells in Utah, the maximum injectionpressure allowed under the State-administered program is determined bythe following equation: Maximum injection pressure = (.733^.433 andmultiply;specific gravity of injection fluid) andmultiply; depth of injection. Theequation for these Indian lands requires lower maximum injection pressuresthan the Utah program except where the TDS of the injected fluids exceedapproximately 250,000 mg/l. Use of the formula will assure that maximuminjection pressures do not exceed those currently in effect in the area,and because there is no necessity for calculation of fluid density or tubingfrictional loss, it is easily administered by the regulatory agency andeasily understood by the regulated community. Higher injection pressuresmay be granted under a permit, provided that the conditions of andSection;144.52(a)(3) are met. One industry commenter suggested that EPA adopt for the Navajo lands theformula used by the State of Utah because most wells are in San Juan County,Utah, and because there is no evidence that Utah's formula will cause degradationof ground water. EPA believes that the formula it has chosen is appropriatefor rule-authorized wells. The higher level of protection afforded throughthe use of this more conservative formula is warranted based on preliminaryreports provided bv the Utah Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining, which suggestthere is an increasing salinity in an overlying USDW in the Aneth field.The EPA is cooperating with the State of Utah, Navajo Nation, and otherfederal agencies to develop a strategy to identify the actual pathwaysand sources of the increasing salinity and to determine if injection activitiescould be accentuating the problem. Lower injection pressures for rule-authorizedwells are therefore deemed desirable at this time. Operators do have theflexibility to seek approval of higher injection pressures based on actualfracture pressure data when the relatively few existing saltwater disposalwells are permitted. G. Maximum Injection Pressure for Enhanced Recovery and Hydrocarbon StorageWells (andSection; 147.3006(b)) Owners or operators of enhanced recovery and hydrocarbon storage wellsmust submit formation specific maximum injection pressure values for fieldsor projects as they do in other Direct Implementation programs (see forexample, andSection; 147.1353 (Montana) or andSection; 147.1654 (New York)).The Agency will then establish appropriate limits for formations or unitsbased on these and other data. The establishment of such ``field rules''for maximum injection pressure has been favored by EPA because fracturegradients may vary considerably within relatively small areas and usuallycannot be accurately described by a single formula. Operators who wishto inject at a higher pressure than those set for the formation and fieldmust demonstrate in writing to the Director that the higher pressure willnot initiate new fractures, propagate existing fractures, or cause themovement of fluid into a USDW. After an opportunity for a public hearingand public comment, the Director may grant the request for higher pressure.Two commenters objected to limitations on injection pressure saying thatthey were too restrictive, that wells had been successfully operated withoutthem on the Navajo reservation for years, and that such restrictions couldalso reduce Federal and Indian royalties from oil and gas production. TheSDWA mandates EPA to protect underground sources of drinking water, andthe Agency is not persuaded by these arguments to depart from its long-establishedpolicies on injection pressure. This is not a new issue for the UIC program.The SDWA directs EPA not to impede injection of brine brought to the surfacein connection with oil and gas production unless it is essential to preventendangerment of underground sources of drinking water. EPA continues tobe convinced that some limitation on injection pressure is essential toprevent fracturing zones adjacent to USDWs and creating avenues of migrationfor contaminants from the injection zone. EPA considered comments similarto this one when promulgating the 1984 Direct Implementation rule and thetechnical rationale for limiting injection pressure has not changed. Thelimitations on injection pressure in this program are identical to thosein other direct implementation programs, and like those programs allowsadjustments of the maximum pressure for each well and field.If the owner of a salt-water disposal well believes that the formula isunnecessarily restrictive in his case, he can request a higher pressurethrough a permit application in compliance with andSection; 144.52(a)(3).The Director sets individual field pressures for enhanced recovery andhydrocarbon storage wells after opportunity for comment and hearing. Ifan owner or operator is still dissatisfied, he may demonstrate to the Directorin writing that a higher pressure will not violate the performance standardof andSection; 144.28(f)(3)(ii) of this chapter. The Director may grant sucha request for a higher pressure after notice and opportunities for publichearing. H. Information To Be Considered in Permit Applications (andSection; 147.3007(b),andSection; 147.3013, and andSection; 147.3015) Owners and operators must submit certain information with permit applicationsin addition to that in the minimum Federal requirements listed at 40 CFR146.14(a) and 146.34(a). These additional requirements, which include informationon expected pressure and fluid changes and sampling methodology, are consistentwith the program of the State of New Mexico and allow for a more thoroughevaluation of permit applications. A portion of this additional information,required for Class III wells, is a direct result of the aquifer clean-uprequirement discussed above. I. Criteria for Aquifer Exemptions (andSection; 147.3008) Several criteria for granting aquifer exemptions under the generic Federalprogram are set forth in 40 CFR 146.4. Under this Indian lands programan aquifer can not be exempted solely on the grounds that ``the total dissolvedsolids content of the ground water is more than 3,000 and less than  10,000 mg/l and it is not reasonably expected to supply a public water system.''This criterion, contained in andSection; 146.4(c), will not apply for theIndian lands covered by this rule, although aquifers could still be exemptedon the other grounds in andSection; 146.4. In most parts of the country, waters above 3,000 mg/l TDS might not reasonablybe expected to supply a public water system. However, in the arid and ruralSouthwest lands for which this program is promulgated such water is usedand needed. The higher level of protection is consistent with the New MexicoState program and is desired by the Indian Tribes. One commenter objected to deletion of the criterion noting that if theaquifer might be expected to supply a public water system that it wouldnot meet the other part of the two part exemption criteria anyway. It istrue that this deletion does not change the substantive law, but it doesshift the assumptions and change EPA's process for approval. Under 40 CFR144.7, a Director's request for an exemption based on the 3,000 TDS criterionin andSection; 146.4(c) will become final 45 days after submission to theAdministrator, if the Administrator does not disapprove. The deletion ofthe criterion for this Indian land program means that aquifers with morethan 3,000 TDS will not receive the semi-automatic approval of andSection;144.7(b)(3)(ii). Instead the drinking water potential of the aquifer willbe specifically examined and the exemption requests will receive a finalreview at the Headquarters level under the procedures of andSection; 144.7(b)(3)(i).J. Area of Review (andSection; 147.3009) The Federal minimum requirements, at 40 CFR 146.6, specify that the Directormay establish the area of review around an injection well either by settinga fixed radius, not less than one-quarter mile, or through the use of anappropriate formula to calculate the zone of endangering influence. For these Indian lands, EPA has adopted the area of review requirementscurrently used in the Utah and New Mexico programs. For Class II wells,the area of review is a fixed radius of one-half mile. For Class I andIII wells, the area of review is a fixed radius of two and one-half miles.Alternatively, an applicant for a Class I or III permit may make eitherof two demonstrations. First, in suitable cases, he may present technicalinformation to show that withdrawal from the injection zone exceeds injectionand results in a net withdrawal from the injection horizon at all times.Second, with the approval of the Director, he may use a mathematical equation,such as the modified form of the Theis equation (set out in 40 CFR 146.6(a)(2))to calculate a zone of endangering influence. If the applicant choosesto make one of the alternative demonstrations, he should also propose aspecific area of review not less than one-quarter mile for the Director'sconsideration.It might appear that the minimum one-quarter mile area of review for ClassI and III wells affords less protection than the fixed radius of one-halfmile for Class II wells. However, the smaller area of review for ClassI and III wells will be approved only where both the net volume of injectedfluids and the maximum injection pressures anticipated (which togetherdefine the zone of endangering influence) is much less than would be allowedunder a one-half mile fixed radius. It is desirable to limit the zone ofendangering influence because this reduces the land area in which thereis potential for movement of fluids through unplugged wells. The States of New Mexico and Utah use these area of review calculationsbecause they are believed to be suitable to the local geologic and environmentalconditions. EPA adopted them to satisfy the strong public desire to followthe surrounding State programs as closely as possible, and to give additionalprotection to the groundwater in this arid region. K. Mechanical Integrity Tests (andSection; 147.3010) The May 11, 1987, <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice proposed approval of radioactive tracersurveys for evaluating the absence of significant leaks under andSection;146.8(a)(2). Since then the Director of the Office of Drinking Water hasapproved use of radioactive tracer surveys for all UIC programs (52 FR35324, September 18, 1987). The proposed Indian land provisions were basedon a prior draft of that approval. Now that the draft has become finaland applies to all UIC programs, there is no reason to publish separateprovisions on radioactive tracer survey for Indian lands. Therefore, EPAhas deleted provisions concerning radioactive tracer surveys from the finalrule. Two people commented on radioactive tracers in this program. A trade associationsupported use of radioactive tracers for demonstrations required by 40CFR 146.8(a) paragraphs (1) and (2). It also suggested allowing use ofradioactive tracer surveys instead of pressure tests to precede monitoringof the annulus. In fact, under EPA's current rules, a radioactive tracersurvey could replace the combination of pressure test and annulus monitoring.The commenter also thought it unnecessary to obtain the approval of theDirector before using the radioactive tracer survey and to do it in conjunctionwith another test. Under the current rules, the radioactive tracer wouldbe sufficient, without a parallel test and without advance approval undercertain geological conditions. The State of Utah objected to the requirementof a pressure test prior to annulus monitoring and the Director approvalof a radioactive survey. As mentioned above, a radioactive survey withoutprior approval may now be used for a part I demonstration and, under certainconditions, for a part II demonstration. (Part I refers to the first partof the standard for demonstrating mechanical integrity in 40 CFR 146.8(a)(i);``no significant leak in the casing, tubing, or packer'' and part II refersto the second part of the standard in 40 CFR 146.8(a)(2): ``no significantfluid movement into an underground source of drinking water through verticalchannels adjacent to the injection well bore.'') Utah also objected tothe requirement that a description of the MIT be submitted for EPA approvalsaying that it would delay permitting. The provision for Director approvalhad been intended to apply to the radioactive tracer surveys. Now thatthe Agency has established policy on the radioactive tracer surveys, advanceapproval is no longer necessary. Therefore, the requirement has been deletedfrom this final rule. The State of Utah also opposed the requirement for all wells to pressure-testbefore monitoring the annulus because some wells are sufficiently pressuredduring completion and because it is irrelevant where there is no USDW toprotect. If an owner or operator does not wish to do a pressure test, hemay now perform a radioactive tracer survey instead. If there is no USDW,the owner or operator may request the Director to reduce or waive certainrequirements under andSection; 144.16. L. Construction Requirements (andSection;andSection; 147.3012, 147.3014) Section 146.12(b) of the generic regulations requires all Class I wellsto be cased and cemented to prevent the movement of fluids into or betweenunderground sources of drinking water. As in other direct implementationprograms, EPA is implementing the broad directive of the regulation byimposing specific cementing requirements appropriate to the local geologicconditions. Section 147.3012 requires that the entire casing-borehole annulusof Class I wells be cemented from bottom to surface, as the New MexicoState UIC program requires. Class III operators will also have to provide a description of the radiologicalcharacteristics of the formation fluids, a necessary part of the pluggingand abandonment plan that includes aquifer clean-up. Monitoring wells maybe required by the Director (under the authority of andSection; 144.52(a)(9))for USDWs below the injection zone of Class III projects, in addition tothose above the injection zone already required by EPA Federal regulations,if these USDWs may be affected by mining operations (andSection; 147.3014).The Navajo commented that a complete radiological and chemical characterizationshould be required under both andSection; 147.3014 and andSection; 147.3015.This would be redundant because andSection; 147.3015 applies to all ClassIII wells, existing as well as newly drilled. <ITAG tagnum="85">VI. Program Contents_Provisions of the Program for Lands of CertainOklahoma Indians </ITAG>A. Introduction EPA is today also promulgating a tailored UIC program covering lands ofmost Oklahoma Indian Tribes. Currently, the State of Oklahoma administersthe approved UIC program for non-Indian lands and for Class II wells onthe lands of the Five Civilized Tribes. 40 CFR 147.1850-147.1851 and 46FR 58489 (Dec. 2, 1981). EPA administers the UIC program for Class II wellson the Osage Mineral Reserves. 40 CFR 147.1852. Today's rule establishesan EPA-administered program for all other Indian lands in Oklahoma includingnon-Class II wells on the lands of the Five Civilized Tribes and the OsageMineral Reserve. There are at least 30 tribes in Oklahoma and currentlyover 200 wells not regulated under a UIC program on the lands of 13 ofthese tribes. Like the program for the lands of the Navajo, Ute Mountain Ute, and NewMexico Tribes, the program for Indian lands in Oklahoma uses the genericFederal standards (40 CFR 124, 144 and 146) as a base and adds a few provisionswhich are similar to provisions in the State program. For a more detaileddiscussion of the background, development, and scope of this rule see sectionsI, II, and III above. A discussion of the scope and rationale of the requirements,comments made on them, and EPA's response appears below. B. Notice (andSection; 147.3101) Owners and operators and the Director of the program have public noticeresponsibilities beyond those in 40 CFR 124.10. An applicant must givenotice of intent to apply for a permit to appropriate tribal governments.EPA will provide notice through newspaper publication and radio broadcast.These provisions are similar to those of the existing State program, andshould help foster meaningful participation by Indian tribes.EPA received comments objecting to the requirement for individual noticein the Oklahoma program also. For the reasons set out in section 2.A. above,EPA has decided to retain the notice requirement for the final rule. Anindustry commenter also objected to the 45-day notice for comment on draftpermits for Class I and III wells, saying that Oklahoma and other Statesonly require a 15-day notice. In fact, the 15-day notice period appliesonly to Class II wells. Oklahoma requires a 45-day comment period for ClassI and III permits. EPA believes that the potential complexity of ClassI and III well permits and the broader public interest in them justifythe longer period. C. Plugging and Abandonment (andSection; 147.3102, andSection; 147.3104, andSection;147.3105 and andSection; 147.3108) EPA has adopted the Oklahoma approach for plugging and abandonment andassociated reporting. The generic Federal standards do not specify detailedplugging requirements, but set forth the basic principle that pluggingshall prevent movement of fluids either into or between underground sourcesof drinking water (40 CFR 146.10). However, the Class II wells in Oklahomaall have similar construction and are completed into a few similarly characterizedstrata, and EPA believes it is expedient to prescribe detailed pluggingrequirements in the regulations. This is consistent with the State programand the EPA-regulated program in Osage County, thereby maintaining consistencywithin Oklahoma. The similarity of the wells allows EPA to set financialresponsibility requirements without detailed plugging plans. The abbreviatedindividual plugging and abandonment plans will not be required of ClassII operators until the operator submits a notice of abandonment to theEPA. The notice of abandonment is due 45 days before planned abandonment.The setting of cement plugs is detailed in this proposal. Cement plugsare required to seal and isolate the injection zone and the lowermost USDW.The space between the cement plugs must be filled with mud, and a cementplug is required at the surface. The cement plugs so placed will preventany movement of fluid into or between USDWs. The plugging requirementswill be made a permit condition in any permit. Finally, the 45-day noticeof abandonment should allow sufficient time for EPA's review and evaluationbecause the detailed plugging specifications in the regulations restrictthe amount of variation in the types of plans EPA will review. The Oklahoma Corporation Commission (OCC) made two comments on the pluggingprovisions. It suggested that EPA emphasize that the specifications areminimums which can be increased if necessary, particularly the size ofthe cement plug. EPA has adopted this suggestion and inserted the phrase``at least'' in several places in the plugging section. The OCC also recommendedadding its definition of mud to the provision. EPA has adopted this suggestionalso, and revised the final rule accordingly. D. Fluid Seals (andSection; 147.3103) Fluid seals will not be allowed as a1ternatives to packers for Class Iwells on these Indian lands. This prohibition is already a requirementin the Oklahoma State program and is more stringent than the minimum Federalstandards. Currently, there is only one Class I well on Indian lands inOklahoma. E. Mechanical Integrity Tests (MIT) (andSection; 147.3107) Any monitoring of annulus pressure pursuant to andSection; 146.8(b)(1) mustbe preceded by a pressure test. A positive gauge pressure must be maintainedupon an annulus filled with liquid during such annulus pressure monitoring.Experience in Oklahoma and elsewhere shows that unless a positive pressureis continuously maintained on the annulus, the continued integrity of thewell cannot be assumed from monitoring. Both initial pressure test andcontinued positive gauge pressure are current Agency guidance. In addition, any pressure test conducted pursuant to andSection; 146.8(b)(2)must be performed with a pressure on the casing/tubing annulus of at least200 pounds per square inch (psi) unless otherwise specified by the Director.When such tests are conducted during well operation, a differential betweenthe injection and annulus pressure of at least 100 psi must be maintainedthroughout the tubing length. For monitoring of the relationship of injection pressure and injectionflow rate in enhanced recovery wells pursuant to andSection; 146.8(b)(3),the monitoring must be preceded by a pressure  test conducted not morethan 90 days prior to commencement of the monitoring. A pressure test priorto monitoring for the flow rate-volume relationship is consistent withcurrent Agency guidance and with practice in the Osage UIC program. A trade association made comments similar to those on the Navajo program,supporting the use of radioactive tracer surveys for demonstrations ofboth parts of the mechanical integrity definition in andSection; 146.8(a).As discussed above, the approval of radioactive tracer surveys for theentire UIC program obviates need for provisions concerning radioactivetracer surveys in these Indian land programs. The trade association alsosaid that pressure on the annulus would be destructive to many wells andthat it is not necessary as a new study demonstrates that monitoring withoutpressure is technically sound. An owner or operator now has the optionof conducting a radioactive tracer if he believes that a pressure testwould be harmful. Finally, existing Class I wells must have a valid mechanical integritytest conducted within 90 days of the date of the required application fora permit. EPA believes that a test should be run as close to the date ofthe application as possible. The operator must give the Director at leastseven days prior-notice of the test so that an observer can be present.The seven-day period is shorter than the period currently in the Federalgeneric standards because there is only one existing Class I well on theIndian lands covered by this rule, which will not present a schedulingproblem.F. Other Comments on the Oklahoma Program Some of the comments did not address any of the specific provisions. Oneindustry commenter supported the proposal because he believed that placinghis Class I well under Federal control will resolve reporting, monitoringand testing requirements and facilitate transfer of primary enforcementresponsibility to the Osage Council, if he should apply for it. A Tribe said that the program is long over-due and should significantlyreduce further ground water contamination. The tribe also wanted to knowwhether EPA, BLM, or BIA would implement the program. It should be clearthat although BIA and BLM have some jurisdiction over injection wells,under the SDWA it is EPA's responsibility to implement the UIC programprotecting underground sources of drinking water. Memoranda of Agreementbetween the three Agencies should reduce conflicts and inconsistencies.Another tribe asserted that it retains inherent authority to regulate activitiesaffecting the natural resources in the tribal management area, and suggestedthat EPA insert a warning that the regulations may be superseded by provisionsof tribal law. While Indian tribes may have authority to regulate injectionactivities, it must be exercised through the statutory framework of theSafe Drinking Water Act. Tribes may now apply for and receive primary enforcementresponsibility for UIC and Public Water System programs. Procedures todo so will be promulgated shortly. The same tribe asked EPA to insert a provision requiring delivery to theTribe of documents submitted to EPA and BIA. These regulations will assurethat the Tribe receives notice of intent to apply for a permit, draft permits,and any other information sent to affected States under 40 CFR 124.10(c).The Tribe also requested addition of a section directing local BIA andEPA officials to release information such as the amount of injection activitiesupon request or subpoena. It appears that the Tribe wishes to use thisinformation to learn more about oil and gas production and mining on itsreservation. Most of the information used in the UIC program is availableto the public, and the Tribe can obtain it without a subpoena or a newregulatory directive. Of course, EPA cannot direct disposal of BIA documents.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Office of Management and Budget Review </ITAG>A. Regulatory Impact Analysis Under Executive Order 12291, EPA must judge whether a regulation is ``major''and therefore requires a Regulatory Impact Analysis. EPA has determinedthat this proposed rule is not a ``major'' rule because it will not havean effect on the economy of $100 million or more, nor will it have a significanteffect on competition, costs, or prices. For the most part this proposalwould extend to a relatively small number of wells the Federal regulationsalready judged not to be major even when applied to all injection wellsin the country. This regulation was submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB)for review as required by Executive Order 12291. B. Regulatory Flexibility Act The original proposal for the generic Federal program concluded that theFederal program would not have a significant impact on a substantial numberof small entities as defined under the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C.605(b)). The extension of a program basically consisting of the Federalrequirements to a limited number of owners and operators, of whom onlysome are ``small entities'' does not change the original assessment. Therefore,I certify that this rule will not have significant impact on a substantialnumber of small entities. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 40 CFR Part 147 </ITAG>Indian lands, Underground injection.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: September 29, 1988.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, Part 147 of Title 40 of the Codeof Federal Regulations is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 147_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 147 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 300h; and 42 U.S.C. 6901 <T3>et seq.</T3></ITAG>2. Part 147 is amended by adding a new Subpart HHH as follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart HHH_Lands of the Navajo, Ute Mountain Ute, and All Other NewMexico Tribes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3000 EPA-administered program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3001 Definition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3002 Public notice of permit actions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3003 Aquifer exemptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3004 Duration of rule authorization for existing Class I and IIIwells. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3005 Radioactive waste injection wells. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3006 Injection pressure for existing Class II wells authorizedby rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3007 Application for a permit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3008 Criteria for aquifer exemptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3009 Area of review. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3010 Mechanical integrity tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3011 Plugging and abandonment of Class III wells. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3012 Construction requirements for Class I wells. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3013 Information to be considered for Class I wells. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3014 Construction requirements for Class III wells. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3015 Information to be considered for Class III wells. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3016 Criteria and standards applicable to Class V wells.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix A to Subpart HHH_Exempted Aquifers in New Mexico. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart HHH_Lands of the Navajo, Ute Mountain Ute, and All Other NewMexico Tribes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3000 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPA-administered program. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Contents. </T3>The UIC program for the Indian lands of the Navajo,the Ute Mountain Ute (Class II wells only on Ute Mountain Ute lands inColorado and all wells on Ute Mountain Ute lands in Utah and New Mexico),and all wells on other Indian lands in New Mexico is administered by EPA.(The term ``Indian lands'' is defined at 40 CFR 144.3.) The Navajo Indianlands are in the States of Arizona, New Mexico and Utah; and the Ute MountainUte lands are in Colorado, New Mexico and Utah. This program consists ofthe UIC program requirements of 40 CFR Parts 124, 144, and 146 and additionalrequirements set forth in the remainder of this subpart. The additionsand modifications of this subpart apply only to the Indian lands describedabove. Injection well owners and operators and EPA shall comply with theserequirements. (b) <T3>Effective date. </T3>The effective date for the UIC program on theselands is November 25, 1988. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3001 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definition. </ITAG><T3>Area of review. </T3>For the purposes of this subpart, area of reviewmeans the area surrounding an injection well or project area describedaccording to the criteria set forth in andSection; 147.3009 of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3002</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Public notice of permit actions. </ITAG>An applicant shall give public notice of his intention to apply for a permitas follows: (a) Prior to submitting an application to the Director, the applicant shallgive notice to each landowner, tenant, and operator of a producing leasewithin one-half mile of the well and to the affected Tribal Government.The notice shall include: (1) Name and address of applicant; (2) A brief description of the planned injection activities including welllocation, name and depth of the injection zone, maximum injection pressureand volume, and source and description of the fluid to be injected; (3) Name, address, and phone number of the EPA contact person; and (4) A statement that opportunity to comment will be announced to the publicafter EPA prepares a draft permit. (b) In addition to the requirements of andSection; 144.31(e) of this chapter,a permit applicant shall submit a description of the way the notice wasgiven and the names and addresses of those to whom it was given. (c) Upon written request and supporting documentation, the Director maywaive the requirement in paragraph (a) of this section to give individualnotice of intent to apply for permits in an area where it would be impractical.However, notice to the affected Tribal government shall not be waived.(d) The Director shall also provide to the affected Tribal government allnotices given to State governments under andSection; 124.10(c) of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3003 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Aquifer exemptions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Aquifer exemptions in connection with Class II wells. </T3>In accordancewith andSection; 144.7(b) and andSection; 146.4 of this chapter, the portionsof authorized injection zones into which existing Class II wells are currentlyinjecting which are described in Appendix A are hereby exempted. The exemptedaquifers are defined by a one-quarter mile radius from the existing injectionwell. The exemption includes the intended injection zone only and is solelyfor the purpose of Class II injection. (b) <T3>Class III wells. </T3>In addition to the requirements of andSection;144.7(c)(1) of this chapter, an applicant for a uranium mining permit whichnecessitates an aquifer exemption shall submit a plugging and abandonmentplan containing an aquifer cleanup plan, acceptable to the Director, describingthe methods or techniques that will be used to meet the standards of andSection;147.3011. The cleanup plan shall include an analysis of pre-injection waterquality for the constituents required by the Director. The Director shallconsider the cleanup plan in addition to the other information requiredfor permit applications under andSection;andSection; 144.31(e) and 146.34 ofthis chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3004</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of rule authorization for existing Class I and III wells. </ITAG>Notwithstanding andSection; 144.21(a)(3)(i)(B) of this chapter, authorizationby rule for existing Class I and III wells will expire 90 days after theeffective date of this UIC program unless a complete permit applicationhas been submitted to the Director. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3005</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Radioactive waste injection wells.  </ITAG>Notwithstanding andSection;andSection; 144.24 and 146.51(b) of this chapter,owners and operators of wells used to dispose of radioactive waste (asdefined in 10 CFR Part 20, Appendix B, Table II, but not including highlevel and transuranic waste and spent nuclear fuel covered by 40 CFR Part191) shall comply with the permitting requirements pertaining to ClassI wells in Parts 124, 144 and 146 of this chapter, as modified and supplementedby this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3006</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Injection pressure for existing Class II wells authorized by rule.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Rule-authorized Class II saltwater disposal wells. </T3>In additionto the requirements of andSection; 144.28(f)(3)(ii) of this chapter, theowner or operator shall, except during well stimulation, use an injectionpressure measured at the wellhead that is not greater than the pressurecalculated by using the following formula: Pm=0.2d<ITAG tagnum="26">where:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Pm=injection pressure at the wellhead in pounds per square inch </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">d=depth in feet to the top of the injection zone.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Owners and operators shall comply with this requirement no later thanone year after the effective date of this program. (b) <T3>Rule-authorized Class II enhanced recovery and hydrocarbon storagewells. </T3>(1) In addition to the requirements of andSection; 144.28(f)(3)(ii)of this chapter, owners and operators shall use an injection pressure nogreater than the pressure established by the Director for the field orformation in which the well is located. The Director shall establish suchmaximum pressure after notice (including notice to the affected Tribe),opportunity for comment, and opportunity for public hearing according tothe provisions of Part 124, Subpart A, of this chapter, and shall informowners and operators and the affected Tribe in writing of the applicablemaximum pressure; or (2) An owner or operator may inject at a pressure greater than that specifiedin paragraph (b)(1) of this section for the field or formation in whichhe is operating after demonstrating in writing to the satisfaction of theDirector that such injection pressure will not violate the requirementsof andSection; 144.28(f)(3)(ii) of this chapter. The Director may grant sucha request after notice (including notice to the affected Tribe), opportunityfor comment and opportunity for a public hearing according to the provisionsof Part 124, Subpart A of this chapter. (3) Prior to the time that the Director establishes rules for maximum injectionpressure under paragraph (b)(1) of this section the owner or operator shall:(i) Limit injection pressure to a value which will not exceed the operatingrequirements of andSection; 144.28(f)(3)(ii); and (ii) Submit data acceptable to the Director which defines the fracturepressure of the formation in which injection is taking place. A singlesubmission may be made on behalf of two or more operators conducting operationsin the same field and formation, if the Director approves. The data shallbe submitted to the Director within one year of the effective date of thisprogram. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3007</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application for a permit. </ITAG>(a) Notwithstanding the requirements of andSection; 144.31(c)(1) of thischapter, the owner or operator of an existing Class I or III well shallsubmit a complete permit application no later than 90 days after the effectivedate of the program. (b) The topographic map (or other map if a topographic map is unavailable)required by andSection; 144.31(e)(7) of this chapter, shall extend two milesfrom Class II wells, and 2\1/2\ miles from Class I and III wells. Thesemaps will show all the information listed in paragraph 144.31(e)(7) within\1/2\ mile for Class II wells and 2\1/2\ miles for Class I and III wells.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3008</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for aquifer exemptions. </ITAG>The aquifer exemption criterion in andSection; 146.4(c) of this chapter shallnot be available for this program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3009</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Area of review. </ITAG>The area of review shall be defined as follows: (a) <T3>Class II wells. </T3>The area of review for Class II permits and areapermits shall be defined by a fixed radius as described in andSection; 146.6(b)(1) and (2) of this chapter except that the radius shall be one-half mile.(b) <T3>Class I and III wells. </T3>The area of review for Class I and IIIwells are well fields which may be either:  (1) An area defined by a radius two and one-half miles from the well orwell field; or (2) An area one-quarter mile from the well or well field where the wellfield production at the times exceeds injection to produce a net withdrawal;or (3) A suitable distance, not less than one-quarter mile, proposed by theowner or operator and approved by the Director based upon a mathematicalcalculation such as that found in andSection; 146.6(a)(2) of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 147.3010</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mechanical integrity tests. </ITAG>The monitoring of annulus pressure listed in 146.8(b)(1) of this chapterwill only be acceptable if preceded by a pressure test, using liquid orgas that clearly demonstrates that mechanical integrity exists at the timeof the pressure test. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3011</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plugging and abandonment of Class III wells. </ITAG>To meet the requirements of paragraph 146.10 (d) of this chapter, ownersand operators of Class III uranium projects underlying or in aquifers containingup to 5,000 mg/l TDS which have been exempted under andSection; 146.4 ofthis chapter shall: (a) Include in the required plugging and abandonment plan a plan for aquiferclean-up and monitoring which demonstrates adequate protection of surroundingUSDWs. (1) The Director shall include in each such permit for a Class III uraniumproject the concentrations of contaminants to which aquifers must be cleanedup in order to protect surrounding USDWs. (2) The concentrations will be set as close as is feasible to the originalconditions. (b) When requesting permission to plug a well, owners and operators shallsubmit for the Director's approval a schedule for the proposed aquifercleanup, in addition to the information required by andSection; 146.34(c).(c) Cleanup and monitoring shall be continued until the owner or operatorcertifies that no constituent listed in the permit exceeds the concentrationsrequired by the permit, and the Director notifies the permittee in writingthat c1eanup activity may be terminated. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3012</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Construction requirements for Class I wells. </ITAG>In addition to the cementing requirement of andSection; 146.12(b) of thischapter, owners and operators of Class I wells shall, through circulation,cement all casing to the surface. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3013</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information to be considered for Class I wells. </ITAG>(a) In addition to the information listed in andSection; 146.14(a) of thischapter, the Director shall consider the following prior to issuing anyClass I permit: (1) Expected pressure changes, native fluid displacement, and directionof movement of the injected fluid; and (2) Methods to be used for sampling, and for measurement and calculationof flow. (b) In addition to the information listed in andSection; 146.14(b) of thischapter, the Director shall consider any information required under andSection;146.14(a) of this chapter (as supplemented by this subpart) that has beengathered during construction. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3014</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Construction requirements for Class III wells. </ITAG>(a) In addition to the requirements of andSection; 146.32(c)(3) of this chapter,radiological characteristics of the formation fluids shall be providedto the Director. (b) In addition to the requirements of andSection; 146.32(e) of this chapter,the Director may require monitoring wells to be completed into USDWs belowthe injection zone if those USDWs may be affected by mining operations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3015</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information to be considered for Class III wells. </ITAG>(a) In addition to the requirements of andSection; 146.34(a) of this chapter,the following information shall be considered by the Director: (1) Proposed construction procedures, including a cementing and casingprogram, logging procedures, deviation checks, and a drilling, testingand coring program. (2) Depth to the proposed injection zone, and a chemical, physical andradiological analysis of the ground water in the proposed injection zonesufficient to define pre-injection water quality as required for aquifercleanup by andSection; 147.3011 of this subpart. (3) An aquifer cleanup plan if required by andSection; 147.3003(b) of thissubpart. (4) Any additional information that may be necessary to demonstrate thatcleanup will reduce the level of contaminants in the surrounding USDWsas close as feasible to the original conditions. (b) In addition to the requirements of andSection; 146.34(b) of this chapter,the Director shall consider any information required under andSection; 146.34(a)of this chapter (as supplemented by this subpart) that has been gatheredduring construction. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3016</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria and standards applicable to Class V wells. </ITAG>In addition to the criteria and standards applicable to Class V wells setforth in Subpart F of Part 146 of this chapter, owners and operators ofwells that do not fall within the Class IV category but that are used todispose of radioactive wastes (as defined in 10 CFR Part 20, Appendix B,Table II, Column 2, but not including high level and transuranic wastesand spent nuclear fuel covered by 40 CFR Part 191) shall comply with allof the requirements applicable to Class I injection wells in 40 CFR Parts124, 144 and 146 as supplemented by this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A to Subpart HHH_Exempted Aquifers in New Mexico </ITAG>The areas described by a one-quarter mile radius around the following ClassII wells in the listed formations are exempted for the purpose of ClassII injection. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L1,tp0,i1,s75,17,17,17,17,17 </C>  <H1>  </H1><H1>Sec. </H1><H1>  </H1><H1>  </H1><H1>  </H1><H1>Well No.</H1> <ITAG tagnum="21">Arco Oil andamp; Gas Co._Operator/Horseshoe Gallup_Field/Gallup_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>5 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>1650andmin16;FNL </D><D>330andmin16;FEL </D><D>134 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>30 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>703andmin16;FWL </D><D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>28 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>790andmin16;FSL </D><D>2150andmin16;FWL </D><D>167 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>33 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1710andmin16;FSL </D><D>2310andmin16;FEL </D><D>199 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>35 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2105andmin16;FNL </D><D>2105andmin16;FWL </D><D>196 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>4 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>455andmin16;FNL </D><D>4435andmin16;FEL </D><D>219 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>33 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>386andmin16;FWL </D><D>65 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>27 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>2080andmin16;FEL </D><D>164 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>30 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>34 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>730andmin16;FNL </D><D>515andmin16;FWL </D><D>180 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>34 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>813andmin16;FNL </D><D>2036andmin16;FEL </D><D>182 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>2 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>720andmin16;FNL </D><D>2040andmin16;FEL </D><D>229 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>29 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>13 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1975andmin16;FSL </D><D>670andmin16;FWL </D><D>77 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>29 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>22 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>27 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>171 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>35 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>205 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>30 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>2061andmin16;FWL </D><D>7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>31 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>17 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>4 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>330andmin16;FNL </D><D>2160andmin16;FEL </D><D>221 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>29 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>26 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>34 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1990andmin16;FNL </D><D>645andmin16;FEL </D><D>194 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>31 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>640andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>27 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>14 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>2250andmin16;FSL </D><D>2630andmin16;FWL </D><D>94 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NW <D>14 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>625andmin16;FNL </D><D>1995andmin16;FWI, </D><D>69 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>10 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>1900andmin16;FNL </D><D>2080andmin16;FWL</D><D> 271 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>29 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>560andmin16;FSL </D><D>  </D><D>21 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>30 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>29 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2080andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>25 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>122 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>32 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>30 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2021andmin16;FSL </D><D>742andmin16;FWL </D><D>19 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>13 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>82 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>27 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>520andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>150 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>28 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>169 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>29 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>34 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2310andmin16;FNL </D><D>1650andmin16;FWL </D><D>192 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>29 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>27 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1650andmin16;FSL </D><D>330andmin16;FWL </D><D>162 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SE <D>23 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1880andmin16;FSL </D><D>340andmin16;FEL </D><D>96 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>24 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>2050andmin16;FSL </D><D>990andmin16;FWL </D><D>97 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>4 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>2060andmin16;FNL </D><D>1710andmin16;FWL </D><D>232 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>31 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>620andmin16;FNL </D><D>701andmin16;FWL </D><D>30 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>35 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>207 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>32 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>417andmin16;FEL </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NW <D>28 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>152 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NW <D>34 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2140andmin16;FSL </D><D>735andmin16;FWL </D><D>201 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>3 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>2310andmin16;FNL </D><D>1640andmin16;FWL </D><D>236 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>34 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>213 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>30 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FFL </D><D>9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>26 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>175 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>30 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>9 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>1650andmin16;FNL </D><D>2131andmin16;FWL </D><D>264 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>4 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>2310andmin16;FSL </D><D>4390andmin16;FEL </D><D>242 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>2 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>250 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>33 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>386andmin16;FWL </D><D>66 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NE <D>15 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>67 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>33 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>178 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>24 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1875andmin16;FSL </D><D>1900andmin16;FEL </D><D>99 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>28 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>148 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>19 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>680andmin16;FNL </D><D>682andmin16;FWL </D><D>89 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>4 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>1820andmin16;FSL </D><D>2130andmin16;FEL </D><D>244 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>20 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>115 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>25 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>118 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>4 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>3300andmin16;FEL </D><D>253 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>19 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>706andmin16;FWL </D><D>101 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>32 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1950andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>22 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>35 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>605andmin16;FNL </D><D>690andmin16;FWL </D><D>184 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>29 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>417andmin16;FEL </D><D>25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>19 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>2023andmin16;FWL </D><D>95 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>32 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>24 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>3300andmin16;FEL </D><D>107 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>28 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2105andmin16;FNL </D><D>940andmin16;FEL </D><D>154 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>35 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>610andmin16;FNL </D><D>2000andmin16;FEL </D><D>186 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>5 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>990andmin16;FSL </D><D>2310andmin16;FWL </D><D>139 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>28 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>160 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>33 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>330andmin16;FSL </D><D>990andmin16;FEL </D><D>211 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>5 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>330andmin16;FNL </D><D>1650andmin16;FEL </D><D>128 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>27 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1900andmin16;FNL </D><D>2050andmin16;FWL </D><D>156 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>35 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>217 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>10 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>526andmin16;FNL </D><D>330andmin16;FWL </D><D>265 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>21 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1880andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>143 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>24 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>409andmin16;FNL </D><D>1914andmin16;FEL </D><D>87 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>32 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>15 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>34 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>960andmin16;FSL </D><D>910andmin16;FEL </D><D>215 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SE <D>21 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>820andmin16;FSL </D><D>1820andmin16;FEL </D><D>145 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>27 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>610andmin16;FSL </D><D>640andmin16;FEL </D><D>173 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>3 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>1920andmin16;FSL </D><D>350andmin16;FWL </D><D>246 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>19 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>601andmin16;FSL </D><D>2002andmin16;FWL </D><D>111 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SE <D>14 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>330andmin16;FSL </D><D>1900andmin16;FEL </D><D>79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>27 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>520andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>150 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>31 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1724andmin16;FNL </D><D>2067andmin16;FWL </D><D>29 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>32 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>13 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>24 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1998andmin16;FNL </D><D>702andmin16;FEL </D><D>93 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>5 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>126 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>28 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1740andmin16;FSL </D><D>590andmin16;FWL </D><D>158 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>31 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>24 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>760andmin16;FWL </D><D>85</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Energy Reserve Backup Inc._Operator/Horseshoe Gallup_Field/Gallup_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>5 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>10 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>1970andmin16;FSL </D><D>2210andmin16;FWL </D><D>31 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>11 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>2090andmin16;FNL </D><D>2190andmin16;FWI </D><D>29 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>10 </D><D>T30N R16W </D><D>700andmin16;FSL </D><D>500andmin16;FEL </D><D>37</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Solar Petroelum Inc._Operator/Horseshoe_Field/Gallup_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SE <D>11 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>736andmin16;FSL </D><D>2045andmin16;FEL </D><D>205 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>9 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>122 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>4 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FFL </D><D>127 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NE <D>10 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>136 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>4 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>125 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/NW <D>11 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>2300andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>206 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>4 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>103 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>4 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1989andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>128 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>4 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>101 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/NE <D>10 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>117 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/NW <D>10 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>108 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SW <D>10 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>114 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SE <D>3 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>330andmin16;FSL </D><D>2310andmin16;FEL </D><D>143 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>5 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>302 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NE <D>5 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1950andmin16;FNL </D><D>1050andmin16;FEL </D><D>307 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>9 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>990andmin16;FSL </D><D>850andmin16;FEL </D><D>140 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NW <D>10 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>118 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SW <D>11 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>204 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>9 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>115 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SE <D>10 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>990andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>144 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>9 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>123</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>10 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>109</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>11 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>203</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>9 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>134</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>3 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>132</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SW <D>3 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>560andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>110</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>9 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FWL </D><D>133</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>4 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>124</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">WTR Oil Co._Operator/Horseshoe Gallup_Field/Gallup_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>33 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1989andmin16;FWL </D><D>2</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Arco Oil andamp; Gas Co._Operator/Many Rocks Gallup_Field/Gallup_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>7 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>898andmin16;FNL </D><D>500andmin16;FWL </D><D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/NE <D>17 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1673andmin16;FNL </D><D>1789andmin16;FEL </D><D>21 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>17 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1890andmin16;FSL </D><D>2150andmin16;FEL </D><D>23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/NE <D>7 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2310andmin16;FNL </D><D>2310andmin16;FEL </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>8 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1650andmin16;FSL </D><D>1650andmin16;FWL </D><D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NW <D>17 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FNL </D><D>2030andmin16;FWL </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NE <D>18 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>360andmin16;FNL </D><D>855andmin16;FEL </D><D>16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>7 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>716andmin16;FSL </D><D>2185andmin16;FWL </D><D>13 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>17 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>26 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>17 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2040andmin16;FSL </D><D>2070andmin16;FWL </D><D>22 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SW <D>6 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>330andmin16;FSL </D><D>330andmin16;FWL </D><D>1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/NW <D>17 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>2073andmin16;FNL </D><D>641andmin16;FWL </D><D>19 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>17 </D><D>T31N R16W </D><D>1967andmin16;FSL </D><D>981andmin16;FWL </D><D>8</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">James P. Woosley_Operator/Many Rocks Gallup_Field/Gallup_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>20 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>330andmin16;FNL </D><D>2310andmin16;FEL </D><D>13 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SW <D>27 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>990andmin16;FWL </D><D>1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/NW <D>17 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>2310andmin16;FWL </D><D>330andmin16;FWL </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/NW <D>27 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>260andmin16;FWL </D><D>1360andmin16;FNL </D><D>11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SW <D>27 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SE <D>18 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>2474andmin16;FSL </D><D>133andmin16;FEL </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SE <D>27 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>625andmin16;FNL </D><D>2000andmin16;FEL </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/SE <D>28 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>330andmin16;FEL </D><D>12</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Solar Petroleum Inc._Operator/Many Rocks Gallup_Field/Gallup_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>1 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>216 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>2 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>805andmin16;FNL </D><D>940andmin16;FEL </D><D>215 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>2 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>218 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SW <D>1 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>2310andmin16;FSL </D><D>990andmin16;FNL </D><D>223 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>12 </D><D>T31N R17W </D><D>1820andmin16;FNL </D><D>500andmin16;FEL </D><D>217</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">WTR Oil Co._Operator/Many Rocks Gallup_Field/Gallup_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NW <D>35 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>810andmin16;FNL </D><D>510andmin16;FWL </D><D>11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>35 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>660andmin16;FSL </D><D>660andmin16;FEL </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NE <D>34 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>775andmin16;FEL </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>35 </D><D>T32N R16W </D><D>1980andmin16;FNL </D><D>1980andmin16;FWL </D><D>9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>35 </D><D>T32N R17W </D><D>1980andmin16;FSL </D><D>1980andmin16;FEL </D><D>7</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Chaco Oil Co._Operator/Red Mtn Meseverde_Field/Menefee_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NE <D>29 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>395andmin16;FNL </D><D>1265andmin16;FEL </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>20 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>442andmin16;FSL </D><D>2430andmin16;FWL </D><D>17</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Geo Engineering Inc._Operator/Red Mtn Meseverde_Field/Menefee_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>29 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>160andmin16;FNL </D><D>2135andmin16;FEL </D><D>35 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NE <D>29 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>225andmin16;FNL </D><D>1265andmin16;FEL </D><D>7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/NW <D>29 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>1344andmin16;FNL </D><D>2555andmin16;FWL </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>29 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>615andmin16;FNL </D><D>1920andmin16;FEL </D><D>5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NW <D>29 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>834andmin16;FNL </D><D>2113andmin16;FWL </D><D>21 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SE <D>20 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>265andmin16;FSL </D><D>2150andmin16;FEL </D><D>36 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NE/NE <D>29 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>5andmin16;FNL </D><D>1130andmin16;FEL </D><D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>20 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>450andmin16;FSL </D><D>1145andmin16;FEL </D><D>24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>20 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>990andmin16;FSL </D><D>1280andmin16;FEL </D><D>10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/NE <D>29 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>1115andmin16;FNL </D><D>2325andmin16;FEL </D><D>22 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SE <D>20 </D><D>T20N R9W </D><D>1085andmin16;FSL </D><D>860andmin16;FEL </D><D>12</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Tesoro Petroleum Co._Operator/S. Hospah Lower Sand_Field/Hospah_Formation<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NW/SE <D>6 </D><D>T17N R8W </D><D>2310andmin16;FSL </D><D>2310andmin16;FEL </D><D>28 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SE <D>6 </D><D>T17N R8W </D><D>990andmin16;FSL </D><D>2310andmin16;FFL </D><D>34 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SW/SW <D>6 </D><D>T17N R8W </D><D>5andmin16;FSL </D><D>20andmin16;FWL </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SE/SW <D>6 </D><D>T17N R8W </D><D>5andmin16;FSL </D><D>2635andmin16;FWL </D><D>20</D></ITAG></ITAG>3. Part 147 is amended by adding a new Subpart III as follows: <ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart III_Lands of Certain Oklahoma Indian Tribes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3100 EPA-administered program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3101 Public notice of permit actions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3102 Plugging and abandonment plans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3103 Fluid seals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3104 Notice of abandonment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3105 Plugging and abandonment report. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3106 Area of review. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3107 Mechanical integrity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3108 Plugging Class I, II, and III wells. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">147.3109 Timing of mechanical integrity test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart III_Lands of Certain Oklahoma Indian Tribes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPA-administered program.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Contents. </T3>The UIC program for the Indian lands in Oklahoma, exceptfor that covering the Class II wells of the Five Civilized Tribes, is administeredby EPA. The UIC program for all wells on Indian lands in Oklahoma, exceptClass II wells on the Osage Mineral Reserve (found at 40 CFR Part 147,Subpart GGG) and the Class II program for the Five Civilized Tribes consistsof the requirements of 40 CFR Parts 124, 144, and 146 and additional requirementsset forth in the remainder of this subpart. Injection well owners and operatorsand EPA shall comply with these requirements. (b) <T3>Effective date. </T3>The effective date for the UIC program for allwells on Indian lands except Class II wells on the Osage Mineral Reserveand Class II wells on the lands of the Five Civilized Tribes is November25, 1988.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Public notice of permit actions. </ITAG>(a) In addition to the notice requirements of andSection; 124.10 of thischapter, the Director shall provide to the affected Tribal government allnotices given to an affected State government under andSection; 124.10(c)of this chapter. (b) <T3>Class I and III wells. </T3>In addition to the notice requirementsof andSection; 124.10 of this chapter: (1) Owners and operators of Class I and III wells shall notify the affectedTribal government prior to submitting an application for a permit, shallpublish such notice in at least two newspapers of general circulation inthe area of the proposed well, and shall broadcast notice over at leastone local radio station. (2) The Director shall publish a notice of availability of a draft permitin at least two newspapers of general circulation in the area of the proposedwell, and broadcast notice over at least one local radio station. The publicnotice shall allow at least 45 days for public comment. (c) <T3>Class II wells. </T3>In addition to the notice requirements of andSection;124.10 of this chapter: (1) Owners and operators of Class II wells shall give notice of applicationfor a permit to the affected Tribal government prior to submitting theapplication to the Director. (2) In addition to the public notice required for each action listed inandSection; 124.10(a) of this chapter, the Director shall also publish noticein a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the affected areafor actions concerning Class II wells. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plugging and abandonment plans. </ITAG>In lieu of the requirements of andSection; 144.28(c)(1) and (2)(i)-(iii)of this chapter, owners and operators of Class II wells shall comply withthe plugging and abandonment provisions of andSection; 147.3108 of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3103</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fluid seals. </ITAG>Notwithstanding andSection; 144.28(f)(2) and andSection; 146.12(c) of thischapter, owners and operators shall not use a fluid seal as an alternativeto a packer. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3104</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of abandonment. </ITAG>(a) In addition to the notice required by andSection; 144.28(j)(2) of thischapter, the owner or operator shall at the same time submit plugging informationin conformance with andSection; 147.3108 of this subpart including: (1) Type and number of plugs; (2) Elevation of top and bottom of each plug; (3) Method of plug placement; and (4) Type, grade and quantity of cement to be used. (b) In addition to the permit conditions specified in andSection;andSection;144.51 and 144.52 of this chapter, each owner and operator shall submitand each permit shall contain the following information (in conformancewith 146.3108 of this subpart): (1) Type and number of plugs; (2) Elevation of top and bottom of each plug; (3) Method of plug placement; and (4) Type, grade and quantity of cement to be used. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3105</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plugging and abandonment report. </ITAG>(a) In lieu of the time periods for submitting a plugging report in andSection;144.28(k) of this chapter, owners and operators of Class I and III wellsshall submit the report within 15 days of plugging the well and ownersor operators of Class II wells within 30 days of plugging, or at the timeof the next required operational report (whichever is less.) If the requiredoperational report is due less than 15 days following completion of plugging,then the plugging report shall be submitted within 30 days for Class IIwells and 15 days for Class I and III wells. (b) In addition to the requirement of andSection; 144.28(k)(1) of this chapter,owners and operators of Class II wells shall include a statement that thewell was plugged in accordance with andSection; 146.10 of this chapter andandSection; 147.3109 of this subpart, and, if the actual plugging differed,specify the actual procedures used. (c) The schedule upon which reports of plugging must be submitted are changedfrom those in andSection; 144.51(o) to those specified in paragraph (a) ofthis section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3106</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Area of review. </ITAG>(a) When determining the area of review under andSection; 146.6(b) of thischapter, the fixed radius shall be no less than one mile for Class I wellsand one-half mile for Class II and III wells. In the case of an applicationfor an area permit, determination of the area of review under andSection;146.6(b) shall be a fixed width of not less than one mile for the circumscribingarea of Class I projects and one-half mile for the circumscribing areaof Class II and III projects. (b) However, in lieu of andSection; 146.6(c) of this chapter, if the areaof review is determined by a mathematical model pursuant to paragraph andSection;146.6(a) of this chapter, the permissible radius is the result of suchcalculation even if it is less than one mile for Class I wells and one-halffor Class II and III wells. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3107</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mechanical integrity. </ITAG>(a) Monitoring of annulus pressure conducted pursuant to andSection; 146.8(b)(1)shall be preceded by an initial pressure test. A positive gauge pressureon the casing/tubing annulus (filled with liquid) shall be maintained continuously.The pressure shall be monitored monthly. (b) Pressure tests conducted pursuant to andSection; 146.8(b)(2) of thischapter shall be performed with a pressure on the casing/tubing annulusof at least 200 p.s.i. unless otherwise specified by the Director. In addition,pressure tests conducted during well operation shall maintain an injection/annuluspressure differential of at least 100 p.s.i. throughout the tubing length.(c) Monitoring of enhanced recovery wells conducted pursuant to andSection;146.8(b)(3), must be preceded by an initial pressure test that was conductedno more than 90 days prior to the commencement of monitoring. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3108</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plugging Class I, II, and III wells. </ITAG>In addition to the requirements of andSection; 146.10 of this chapter, ownersand operators shall comply with the following when plugging a well: (a) For Class I and III wells: (1) The well shall be filled with mud from the bottom of the well to apoint one hundred (100) feet below the top of the highest disposal or injectionzone and then with a cement plug from there to at least one hundred (100)feet above the top of the disposal or injection zone. (2) A cement plug shall also be set from a point at least fifty (50) feetbelow the shoe of the surface casing to a point at least five (5) feetabove the top of the lowest USDW. (3) A final cement plug shall extend from a point at least thirty feetbelow the ground surface to a point five (5) feet below the ground surface.(4) All intervals between plugs shall be filled with mud. (5) The top plug shall clearly show by permanent markings inscribed inthe cement or on a steel plate embedded in the cement the well permit numberand date of plugging. (b) For Class II wells: (1) The well shall be kept full of mud as casing is removed. No surfacecasing shall be removed without written approval from the Director. (2) If surface casing is adequately set and cemented through all USDWs(set to at least 50 feet below the base of the USDW), a plug shall be setat least 50 feet below the shoe of the casing and extending at least 50feet above the shoe of the casing; or (3) If the surface casing and cementing is inadequate, the well bore shallbe filled with cement from a point at least 50 feet below the base of theUSDW to a point at least 50 feet above the shoe of the surface casing,and any additional plugs as required by the Director. (4) In all cases, the top 20 feet of the well bore below 3 feet of groundsurface shall be filled with cement. Surface casing shall be cut off 3feet below ground surface and covered with a secure steel cap on top ofthe surface pipe. The remaining 3 feet shall be filled with dirt. (5) Except as provided in sub-paragraph (b)(6) of this section, each producingor receiving formation shall be sealed off with at least a 50-foot cementplug placed at the base of the formation and at least a 50-foot cementplug placed at the top of the formation. (6) The requirement in sub-paragraph (b)(5) of this section does not applyif the producing/receiving formation is already sealed off from the wellbore with adequate casing and cementing behind casing, and casing is notto be removed, or the only openings from the producing/receiving formationinto the well bore are perforations in the casing, and the annulus betweenthe casing and the outer walls of the well is filled with cement for adistance of 50 feet above the top of the formation. When such conditionsexist, a bridge plug capped with at least 10 feet of cement set at thetop of the producing formation may be used. (7) When specified by the Director, any uncased hole below the shoe ofany casing to be left in the well shall be filled with cement to a depthof at least 50 feet below the casing shoe, or the bottom of the hole, andthe casing above the shoe shall be filled with cement to at least 50 feetabove the shoe of the casing. If the well has a screen or liner which isnot to be removed, the well bore shall be filled with cement from the baseof the screen or liner to at least 50 feet above the top of the screenor liner. (8) All intervals between cement plugs in the well bore must be filledwith mud. (c) For the purposes of this section mud shall be defined as: mud of notless than thirty-six (36) viscosity (API Full Funnel Method) and a weightof not less than nine (9) pounds per gallon. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3109</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Timing of mechanical integrity test. </ITAG>The demonstrations of mechanical integrity required bv andSection; 146.14(b)(2)of this chapter prior to approval for the operation of a Class I well shall,for an existing well, be conducted no more than 90 days prior to applicationfor the permit and the results included in the permit application. Theowner or operator shall notify the Director at least seven days in advanceof the time and date of the test so that EPA observers may be present.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-24122 Filed 10-24-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>